Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-224
Certification request; Supreme Court; duties.

If a certification request made pursuant to section 24-222 is accepted by the Supreme Court, it shall promptly notify the requesting court in writing of such fact and the proceedings shall thereafter be as provided by the Supreme Court. The Supreme Court shall provide an expedited briefing and hearing process so that resolution of the accepted question may be promptly determined and justice not delayed.

Laws 1982, LB 724, § 6.